Mississippi statutes. Title 69. Agriculture, Horticulture, and Animals
General Provisions

§ 69-2-1.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Mississippi Farm Reform Act of 1987.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 482, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1987).

§ 69-2-3.
Legislative intent.

The Legislature hereby finds and declares that there exists within the state a serious emergency as a result of the nation’s agricultural crisis and that there is a need to ensure that services are available for farmers, farm laborers, farm families and small businesses who have been adversely affected by the declining agricultural economy. Existing state programs need to be dedicated to meet these needs to the extent possible without creating additional administration. It is important that existing programs and services be coordinated into a network so that those in the agricultural and small business community can learn of these programs and services and obtain their benefits as expeditiously as possible.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 482, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1987).

§ 69-2-5.
Information regarding programs and services; assistance provided by and donations to clearinghouse; report to Governor [Repealed effective July 1, 2023].

The Mississippi Cooperative Extension Service shall act as a clearinghouse for the dissemination of information regarding programs and services which may be available to help those persons and businesses which have been adversely affected by the present emergency in the agricultural community. The Cooperative Extension Service shall develop a plan of assistance which shall identify all programs and services available within the state which can be of assistance to those affected by the present emergency. The Department of Agriculture and Commerce, Department of Finance and Administration, Department of Human Services, Department of Mental Health, State Department of Health, Board of Trustees of State Institutions of Higher Learning, Mississippi Community College Board, Research and Development Center, Mississippi Development Authority, Department of Employment Security, Office of the Governor, Board of Vocational and Technical Education, Mississippi Authority for Educational Television, and other agencies of the state which have programs and services that can be of assistance to those affected by the present emergency, shall provide information regarding their programs and services to the Cooperative Extension Service for use in the clearinghouse. The types of programs and services shall include, but not be limited to, financial counseling, farm and small business management, employment services, labor market information, job retraining, vocational and technical training, food stamp programs, personal counseling, health services, and free or low cost legal services. The clearinghouse shall provide a single contact point to provide program information and referral services to individuals interested or needing services from state-funded assistance programs affecting agriculture, horticulture, aquaculture and other agribusinesses or related industries. Such assistance information shall identify all monies available under the Small Business Financing Act, the Business Investment Act, the Emerging Crops Fund legislation and any other sources which may be used singularly or combined, to provide a comprehensive financing package. The provisions of this section in establishing a single contact point for information and referral services shall not be construed to authorize the hiring of additional personnel.

The Cooperative Extension Service may accept monetary or in-kind contributions, gifts and grants for the establishment or operation of the clearinghouse.

The Cooperative Extension Service shall establish a method for the dissemination of information to those who can be benefited by the existing programs and services of the state.

The Cooperative Extension Service shall file an annual report with the Governor, Lieutenant Governor and Speaker of the House of Representatives regarding the efforts which have been made in the clearinghouse operation. The report shall also recommend any additional measures, including legislation, which may be needed or desired in providing programs and benefits to those affected by the agricultural emergency.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 482, § 3; Laws, 1988, ch. 503; Laws, 2004, ch. 572, § 56; reenacted without change, Laws, 2008, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 30, § 56; reenacted and amended, Laws, 2010, ch. 559, § 56; reenacted without change, Laws, 2011, ch. 471, § 57; Laws, 2014, ch. 397, § 62, eff from and after July 1, 2014; reenacted without change, Laws, 2019, ch. 451, § 56, eff from and after passage (approved April 3, 2019).

§ 69-2-7.
Encouragement of new crops and more profitable enterprises.

The Legislature states that the purpose of Sections 69-2-7 through 69-2-17 of this chapter is to encourage the production of crops (plant or animal) on Mississippi farms which have not been previously produced commercially.

It is the intent of the Legislature to encourage the farm sector of this state to shift from enterprises with low profit margins to those with higher profit margins.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 482, § 4, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1987).

§ 69-2-9.
Definitions.

For the purposes of Sections 69-2-7 through 69-2-41, the following words shall have the meanings ascribed in this section unless the context otherwise requires:

“Department” means the Mississippi Department of Economic and Community Development.

“Emerging crop” means any new, nontraditional plant or animal crop (as designated by a board consisting of the executive directors of the department, the Mississippi Cooperative Extension Service and the Mississippi Agricultural and Forestry Experiment Station) or as specified in Section 69-2-11 which has a development time from beginning of production to harvest or initial sale of the product of not more than five (5) years.

“Farmer” means a resident of Mississippi who engages in or wishes to engage in the commercial production of an emerging crop on land in Mississippi. This term shall include individuals, partnerships and corporations.

“Fund” means the Emerging Crops Fund established in Section 69-2-13.

“Interest loan” means a loan made from the fund to pay the interest on a loan made by a lender to a farmer to finance the nonland capital costs of establishing production of an emerging crop.

“Lender” means a commercial bank, savings bank, savings and loan association, federal land bank, farm credit bank, production credit association or other farm credit agency which is domiciled or qualified to do business in Mississippi, or the Farmers Home Administration.

“Agribusiness” means any agricultural, aquacultural, horticultural, industrial, manufacturing, research and development or processing enterprise or enterprises.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 482, § 5; Laws, 1988, ch. 356, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 580, § 18; Laws, 1990, ch. 570, § 17; Laws, 1996, ch. 415, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved March 25, 1996).

§ 69-2-11.
Emerging crop designations.

Emerging crop designations shall include, but not be limited to:

Blueberries;

Muscadines;

Christmas trees;

Aquaculture, including any species from the Gulf of Mexico and its tributaries;

Horticulture;

Rabbit farming and processing; and

Others designated by the Board of Economic Development or Legislature.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 482, § 6; Laws, 1996, ch. 415, § 2; Laws, 1998, ch. 536, § 8, eff from and after passage (approved April 9, 1998).

§ 69-2-13.
Emerging Crops Fund; loans for agribusinesses and small business concerns; loans for planning and development districts; program to assist minority business enterprises; loans for regional crafts projects; financing agribusiness programs; funds for rehabilitation, maintenance and advertising of Mississippi Farmers Central Market; program of loan guaranties on behalf of qualified nonprofit entities designated as community development financial institutions to encourage financing for loans in low-income communities; grants to certain agribusiness enterprises processing, drying, storing or shipping peanuts; program of loan guaranties on behalf of certain sweet potato growing and farming agribusinesses.

There is hereby established in the State Treasury a fund to be known as the “Emerging Crops Fund,” which shall be used to pay the interest on loans made to farmers for nonland capital costs of establishing production of emerging crops on land in Mississippi, and to make loans and grants which are authorized under this section to be made from the fund. The fund shall be administered by the Mississippi Development Authority. A board comprised of the directors of the authority, the Mississippi Cooperative Extension Service, the Mississippi Small Farm Development Center and the Mississippi Agricultural and Forestry Experiment Station, or their designees, shall develop definitions, guidelines and procedures for the implementation of this chapter. Funds for the Emerging Crops Fund shall be provided from the issuance of bonds or notes under Sections 69-2-19 through 69-2-37 and from repayment of interest loans made from the fund.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall develop a program which gives fair consideration to making loans for the processing and manufacturing of goods and services by agribusiness, greenhouse production horticulture, and small business concerns. It is the policy of the State of Mississippi that the Mississippi Development Authority shall give due recognition to and shall aid, counsel, assist and protect, insofar as is possible, the interests of agribusiness, greenhouse production horticulture, and small business concerns. To ensure that the purposes of this subsection are carried out, the Mississippi Development Authority shall loan not more than One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) to finance any single agribusiness, greenhouse production horticulture, or small business concern. Loans made pursuant to this subsection shall be made in accordance with the criteria established in Section 57-71-11.

The Mississippi Development Authority may, out of the total amount of bonds authorized to be issued under this chapter, make available funds to any planning and development district in accordance with the criteria established in Section 57-71-11. Planning and development districts which receive monies pursuant to this provision shall use such monies to make loans to private companies for purposes consistent with this subsection.

The Mississippi Development Authority is hereby authorized to engage legal services, financial advisors, appraisers and consultants if needed to review and close loans made hereunder and to establish and assess reasonable fees including, but not limited to, liquidation expenses.

The State Auditor may conduct performance and compliance audits under this chapter according to Section 7-7-211(o) and may bill the oversight agency.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall, in addition to the other programs described in this section, provide for the following programs of loans to be made to agribusiness or greenhouse production horticulture enterprises for the purpose of encouraging thereby the extension of conventional financing and the issuance of letters of credit to such agribusiness or greenhouse production horticulture enterprises by private institutions. Monies to make such loans by the Mississippi Development Authority shall be drawn from the Emerging Crops Fund.

The Mississippi Development Authority may make loans to agribusiness or greenhouse production horticulture enterprises. The amount of any loan to any single enterprise under this paragraph (b) shall not exceed twenty percent (20%) of the total cost of the project for which financing is sought or Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00), whichever is less. No interest shall be charged on such loans, and only the amount actually loaned shall be required to be repaid. Repayments shall be deposited into the Emerging Crops Fund.

The Mississippi Development Authority also may make loans under this subsection (3) to existing agribusiness or greenhouse production horticulture enterprises for the purpose of assisting such enterprises to make upgrades, renovations, repairs and other improvements to their equipment, facilities and operations, which shall not exceed Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($200,000.00) or thirty percent (30%) of the total cost of the project for which financing is sought, whichever is less. No interest shall be charged on loans made under this paragraph, and only the amount actually loaned shall be required to be repaid. Repayments shall be deposited into the Emerging Crops Fund.

The maximum aggregate amount of loans that may be made under this subsection (3) to any one (1) agribusiness shall be not more than Four Hundred Thousand Dollars ($400,000.00).

Through June 30, 2010, the Mississippi Development Authority may loan or grant to qualified planning and development districts, and to small business investment corporations, bank-based community development corporations, the Recruitment and Training Program, Inc., the City of Jackson Business Development Loan Fund, the Lorman Southwest Mississippi Development Corporation, the West Jackson Community Development Corporation, the East Mississippi Development Corporation, and other entities meeting the criteria established by the Mississippi Development Authority (all referred to hereinafter as “qualified entities”), funds for the purpose of establishing loan revolving funds to assist in providing financing for minority economic development. The monies loaned or granted by the Mississippi Development Authority shall be drawn from the Emerging Crops Fund and shall not exceed Twenty-nine Million Dollars ($29,000,000.00) in the aggregate. Planning and development districts or qualified entities which receive monies pursuant to this provision shall use such monies to make loans to minority business enterprises consistent with criteria established by the Mississippi Development Authority. Such criteria shall include, at a minimum, the following:

The business enterprise must be a private, for-profit enterprise.

If the business enterprise is a proprietorship, the borrower must be a resident citizen of the State of Mississippi; if the business enterprise is a corporation or partnership, at least fifty percent (50%) of the owners must be resident citizens of the State of Mississippi.

The borrower must have at least five percent (5%) equity interest in the business enterprise.

The borrower must demonstrate ability to repay the loan.

The borrower must not be in default of any previous loan from the state or federal government.

Loan proceeds may be used for financing all project costs associated with development or expansion of a new small business, including fixed assets, working capital, start-up costs, rental payments, interest expense during construction and professional fees related to the project.

Loan proceeds shall not be used to pay off existing debt for loan consolidation purposes; to finance the acquisition, construction, improvement or operation of real property which is to be held primarily for sale or investment; to provide for, or free funds, for speculation in any kind of property; or as a loan to owners, partners or stockholders of the applicant which do not change ownership interest by the applicant. However, this does not apply to ordinary compensation for services rendered in the course of business.

The maximum amount that may be loaned to any one (1) borrower shall be Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00).

The Mississippi Development Authority shall review each loan before it is made, and no loan shall be made to any borrower until the loan has been reviewed and approved by the Mississippi Development Authority.

For the purpose of this subsection, the term “minority business enterprise” means a socially and economically disadvantaged small business concern, organized for profit, performing a commercially useful function which is owned and controlled by one or more minorities or minority business enterprises certified by the Mississippi Development Authority, at least fifty percent (50%) of whom are resident citizens of the State of Mississippi. Except as otherwise provided, for purposes of this subsection, the term “socially and economically disadvantaged small business concern” shall have the meaning ascribed to such term under the Small Business Act (15 USCS, Section 637(a)), or women, and the term “owned and controlled” means a business in which one or more minorities or minority business enterprises certified by the Mississippi Development Authority own sixty percent (60%) or, in the case of a corporation, sixty percent (60%) of the voting stock, and control sixty percent (60%) of the management and daily business operations of the business. However, an individual whose personal net worth exceeds Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) shall not be considered to be an economically disadvantaged individual.

From and after July 1, 2010, monies not loaned or granted by the Mississippi Development Authority to planning and development districts or qualified entities under this subsection, and monies not loaned by planning and development districts or qualified entities, shall be deposited to the credit of the sinking fund created and maintained in the State Treasury for the retirement of bonds issued under Section 69-2-19.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this subsection to the contrary, if federal funds are not available for commitments made by a planning and development district to provide assistance under any federal loan program administered by the planning and development district in coordination with the Appalachian Regional Commission or Economic Development Administration, or both, a planning and development district may use funds in its loan revolving fund, which have not been committed otherwise to provide assistance, for the purpose of providing temporary funding for such commitments. If a planning and development district uses uncommitted funds in its loan revolving fund to provide such temporary funding, the district shall use funds repaid to the district under the temporarily funded federal loan program to replenish the funds used to provide the temporary funding. Funds used by a planning and development district to provide temporary funding under this paragraph (c) must be repaid to the district’s loan revolving fund no later than twelve (12) months after the date the district provides the temporary funding. A planning and development district may not use uncommitted funds in its loan revolving fund to provide temporary funding under this paragraph (c) on more than two (2) occasions during a calendar year. A planning and development district may provide temporary funding for multiple commitments on each such occasion. The maximum aggregate amount of uncommitted funds in a loan revolving fund that may be used for such purposes during a calendar year shall not exceed seventy percent (70%) of the uncommitted funds in the loan revolving fund on the date the district first provides temporary funding during the calendar year.

If the Mississippi Development Authority determines that a planning and development district or qualified entity has provided loans to minority businesses in a manner inconsistent with the provisions of this subsection, then the amount of such loans so provided shall be withheld by the Mississippi Development Authority from any additional grant funds to which the planning and development district or qualified entity becomes entitled under this subsection. If the Mississippi Development Authority determines, after notifying such planning and development district or qualified entity twice in writing and providing such planning and development district or qualified entity a reasonable opportunity to comply, that a planning and development district or qualified entity has consistently failed to comply with this subsection, the Mississippi Development Authority may declare such planning and development district or qualified entity in default under this subsection and, upon receipt of notice thereof from the Mississippi Development Authority, such planning and development district or qualified entity shall immediately cease providing loans under this subsection, shall refund to the Mississippi Development Authority for distribution to other planning and development districts or qualified entities all funds held in its revolving loan fund and, if required by the Mississippi Development Authority, shall convey to the Mississippi Development Authority all administrative and management control of loans provided by it under this subsection.

If the Mississippi Development Authority determines, after notifying a planning and development district or qualified entity twice in writing and providing copies of such notification to each member of the Legislature in whose district or in a part of whose district such planning and development district or qualified entity is located and providing such planning and development district or qualified entity a reasonable opportunity to take corrective action, that a planning and development district or qualified entity administering a revolving loan fund under the provisions of this subsection is not actively engaged in lending as defined by the rules and regulations of the Mississippi Development Authority, the Mississippi Development Authority may declare such planning and development district or qualified entity in default under this subsection and, upon receipt of notice thereof from the Mississippi Development Authority, such planning and development district or qualified entity shall immediately cease providing loans under this subsection, shall refund to the Mississippi Development Authority for distribution to other planning and development districts or qualified entities all funds held in its revolving loan fund and, if required by the Mississippi Development Authority, shall convey to the Mississippi Development Authority all administrative and management control of loans provided by it under this subsection.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall develop a program which will assist minority business enterprises by guaranteeing bid, performance and payment bonds which such minority businesses are required to obtain in order to contract with federal agencies, state agencies or political subdivisions of the state. The Mississippi Development Authority may secure letters of credit, as determined necessary by the authority, to guarantee bid, performance and payment bonds pursuant to this subsection. Monies for such program shall be drawn from the monies allocated under subsection (4) of this section to assist the financing of minority economic development and shall not exceed Three Million Dollars ($3,000,000.00) in the aggregate. The Mississippi Development Authority may promulgate rules and regulations for the operation of the program established pursuant to this subsection. For the purpose of this subsection (5), the term “minority business enterprise” has the meaning assigned such term in subsection (4) of this section.

The Mississippi Development Authority may loan or grant to public entities and to nonprofit corporations funds to defray the expense of financing (or to match any funds available from other public or private sources for the expense of financing) projects in this state which are devoted to the study, teaching and/or promotion of regional crafts and which are deemed by the authority to be significant tourist attractions. The monies loaned or granted shall be drawn from the Emerging Crops Fund and shall not exceed Two Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($250,000.00) in the aggregate.

Through June 30, 2006, the Mississippi Development Authority shall make available to the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce funds for the purpose of establishing loan revolving funds and other methods of financing for agribusiness programs administered under the Mississippi Agribusiness Council Act of 1993. The monies made available by the Mississippi Development Authority shall be drawn from the Emerging Crops Fund and shall not exceed One Million Two Hundred Thousand Dollars ($1,200,000.00) in the aggregate. The Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce shall establish control and auditing procedures for use of these funds. These funds will be used primarily for quick payment to farmers for vegetable and fruit crops processed and sold through vegetable processing plants associated with the Department of Agriculture and Commerce and the Mississippi State Extension Service.

From and after July 1, 1996, the Mississippi Development Authority shall make available to the Mississippi Small Farm Development Center One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) to be used by the center to assist small entrepreneurs as provided in Section 37-101-25, Mississippi Code of 1972. The monies made available by the Mississippi Development Authority shall be drawn from the Emerging Crops Fund.

[Repealed]

The Mississippi Development Authority shall make available to the Small Farm Development Center at Alcorn State University funds in an aggregate amount not to exceed Three Hundred Thousand Dollars ($300,000.00), to be drawn from the cash balance of the Emerging Crops Fund. The Small Farm Development Center at Alcorn State University shall use such funds to make loans to producers of sweet potatoes and cooperatives anywhere in the State of Mississippi owned by sweet potato producers to assist in the planting of sweet potatoes and the purchase of sweet potato production and harvesting equipment. A report of the loans made under this subsection shall be furnished by January 15 of each year to the Chairman of the Senate Agriculture Committee and the Chairman of the House Agriculture Committee.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall make available to the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce “Make Mine Mississippi” program an amount not to exceed One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) to be drawn from the cash balance of the Emerging Crops Fund.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall make available to the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce an amount not to exceed One Hundred Fifty Thousand Dollars ($150,000.00) to be drawn from the cash balance of the Emerging Crops Fund to be used for the rehabilitation and maintenance of the Mississippi Farmers Central Market in Jackson, Mississippi.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall make available to the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce an amount not to exceed Twenty-five Thousand Dollars ($25,000.00) to be drawn from the cash balance of the Emerging Crops Fund to be used for advertising purposes related to the Mississippi Farmers Central Market in Jackson, Mississippi.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall, in addition to the other programs described in this section, provide for a program of loan guaranties to be made on behalf of any nonprofit entity qualified under Section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code and certified by the United States Department of the Treasury as a community development financial institution for the purpose of encouraging the extension of financing to such an entity which financing the entity will use to make funds available to other entities for the purpose of making loans available in low-income communities in Mississippi. Monies to make such loan guaranties by the Mississippi Development Authority shall be drawn from the Emerging Crops Fund and shall not exceed Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00) in the aggregate. The amount of a loan guaranty on behalf of such an entity under this subsection (14) shall not exceed Two Million Dollars ($2,000,000.00). Assistance received by an entity under this subsection (14) shall not disqualify the entity from obtaining any other assistance under this chapter.

An entity desiring assistance under this subsection (14) must submit an application to the Mississippi Development Authority. The application must include any information required by the Mississippi Development Authority.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program established under this subsection (14), and the Mississippi Development Authority shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, necessary for the implementation of this subsection (14).

The Mississippi Development Authority shall, in addition to the other programs described in this section, provide for a program of grants to agribusiness enterprises that process, dry, store or ship peanuts and if the enterprise has invested prior to April 17, 2009, a minimum of Six Million Dollars ($6,000,000.00) in land, facilities and equipment in this state that are utilized to process, dry, store or ship peanuts. Monies to make such grants by the Mississippi Development Authority shall be drawn from the Emerging Crops Fund and shall not exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00) in the aggregate. The amount of a grant under this subsection (15) shall not exceed One Million Dollars ($1,000,000.00).

An entity desiring assistance under this subsection (15) must submit an application to the Mississippi Development Authority. The application must include a description of the project for which assistance is requested, the cost of the project for which assistance is requested, the amount of assistance requested and any other information required by the Mississippi Development Authority.

As a condition of the receipt of a grant under this subsection (15), an entity must agree to remain in business in this state for not less than five (5) years and must meet other conditions established by the Mississippi Development Authority to ensure that the assistance results in an economic benefit to the state. The Mississippi Development Authority shall require that binding commitments be entered into requiring that:

The minimum requirements provided for in this subsection (15) and the conditions established by the Mississippi Development Authority are met; and

If such commitments and conditions are not met, all or a portion of the funds provided pursuant to this subsection (15) shall be repaid.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program established under this subsection (15), and the Mississippi Development Authority shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, necessary for the implementation of this subsection (15).

The Mississippi Development Authority, in addition to the other programs described in this section, shall provide for a program of loan guaranties to be made on behalf of certain agribusinesses engaged in sweet potato growing and farming for the purpose of encouraging thereby the extension of conventional financing and the issuance of letters of credit to such agribusinesses by lenders. The amount of a loan guaranty made on behalf of such an agribusiness shall be ninety percent (90%) of the amount of assistance made available by a lender for the purposes authorized under this subsection (16). Monies to make such loan guaranties by the Mississippi Development Authority shall be drawn from the Emerging Crops Fund and shall not exceed Seventeen Million Dollars ($17,000,000.00) in the aggregate.

In order to be eligible for assistance under this subsection (16) an agribusiness must:

Have been actively engaged in sweet potato growing and farming in this state before January 1, 2010;

Have incurred a disaster-related loss for sweet potato growing and farming purposes for calendar year 2009, as determined by a lender;

Agree to obtain and maintain federal Noninsured Agricultural Program (NAP) insurance coverage for the outstanding balance of any assistance received under this subsection (16); and

Satisfy underwriting criteria established by a lender related to loans under this subsection (16).

1. Information verifying the length of time the applicant has been actively engaged in sweet potato growing and farming in this state;

2. Information regarding the number of acres used by the applicant for sweet potato growing and farming purposes during the 2009 calendar year, as certified to by the Farm Services Authority (FSA) or the Mississippi Department of Agriculture and Commerce (MDAC), and the number of acres the applicant intends to use for such purposes during the 2010 calendar year;

3. The average cost per acre incurred by the applicant for sweet potato growing and farming purposes during the 2009 calendar year, as certified to by the FSA or MDAC, and an estimate of the average cost per acre to be incurred by the applicant for such purposes during the calendar year for which application is made;

4. The amount of assistance requested;

5. A statement from the applicant agreeing that he will obtain and maintain NAP insurance coverage for the outstanding balance of any assistance received under this subsection (16); and

6. Any other information required by the lender and/or the MDA.

An entity desiring assistance under this subsection must submit an application for assistance to a lender not later than August 1, 2010. The application must include:

The lender shall review the application for assistance and determine whether the applicant qualifies for assistance under this subsection (16). If the lender determines that the applicant qualifies for assistance, the lender shall loan funds to the applicant subject to the provisions of this subsection (16).

Loans made under this subsection (16) shall be subject to the following conditions:

The maximum amount of a loan to a borrower shall not exceed One Thousand Seven Hundred Dollars ($1,700.00) per acre and shall exclude any machinery and equipment costs.

The proceeds of a loan may be used only for paying a borrower’s sweet potato planting, production and harvesting costs, excluding machinery and equipment costs.

The proceeds of a loan may not be used to repay, satisfy or finance existing debt.

The time allowed for repayment of a loan shall not be more than five (5) years, and there shall be no penalty, fee or other charge imposed for the prepayment of a loan.

The receipt of assistance by a person or other entity under any other program described in this section shall not disqualify the person or entity from obtaining a loan under the program established in this subsection (16) if the person or entity is otherwise eligible under this program. In addition, the receipt of a loan by a person or other entity under the program established under this subsection (16) shall not disqualify the person or entity from obtaining assistance under any other program described in this section.

The Mississippi Development Authority shall have all powers necessary to implement and administer the program established under this subsection (16), and the Mississippi Development Authority shall promulgate rules and regulations, in accordance with the Mississippi Administrative Procedures Law, necessary for the implementation of this subsection (16).

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 482, § 7; Laws, 1988, ch. 580, § 19; Laws, 1989, ch. 524, § 29; Laws, 1990, ch. 570, § 18; Laws, 1991, ch. 584, § 6,; Laws, 1992, ch. 548, § 11; Laws, 1993, ch. 548, § 8; Laws, 1993, ch. 619, § 9; Laws, 1994, ch. 560, § 4; Laws, 1995, ch. 548, § 10; Laws, 1996, ch. 553, § 5; Laws, 1997, ch. 582, § 1; Laws, 1998, ch. 536, § 9; Laws, 2000, ch. 584, § 4; Laws, 2000, ch. 620, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 540, § 1; Laws, 2002, ch. 536, § 1; Laws, 2003, ch. 504, § 1; Laws, 2004, ch. 360, § 1; Laws, 2004, 3rd Ex Sess, ch. 1, § 95; Laws, 2006, ch. 564, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 586, § 1; Laws, 2008, ch. 506, § 6; Laws, 2009, ch. 557, § 31; Laws, 2010, ch. 429, § 1; Laws, 2010, ch. 511, § 27; Laws, 2011, ch. 420, § 1; Laws, 2012, ch. 415, § 1; Laws, 2013, ch. 386, § 1; Laws, 2014, ch. 427, § 9, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 69-2-15.
Interest loans from Emerging Crops Fund.

Any lender which has made a loan to a farmer to finance the nonland capital costs of establishing production of an emerging crop on land in Mississippi may make application to the department for payment of the interest on the loan during the period from beginning of production to harvest or initial sale of the product, which payment shall be made from the fund. The maximum amount of interest loans from the fund for the benefit of any one (1) farmer shall be Fifty Thousand Dollars ($50,000.00). During the period that the department pays the interest on a loan, the maximum rate of interest which may be charged on the loan by the lender shall be four percent (4%) per annum above the New York prime rate. By payment of the interest on a loan, neither the department nor the State of Mississippi shall be a guarantor of the loan, but the state shall have a lien junior to any lien that the lender may have on the loan.

If a farmer defaults on the interest loan the Attorney General of the State of Mississippi shall take the necessary legal action, as soon as practicable, to recover the monies due and owing to the State of Mississippi. A suit against a defaulting party under this section may be brought in the county in which the lender is located, or in any Hinds County court.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 482, § 8; Laws, 1988, ch. 356, § 2, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1988).

§ 69-2-17.
Repayment of interest loans from Emerging Crops Fund.

Repayment of the interest loan from the fund shall be deferred for a period of time not more than five (5) years or the time when the emerging crop should reach maturity. The schedule for repayment of the interest loan shall be a period of time equal to two (2) times the period that interest is paid on the loan for that emerging crop from the fund. No interest shall be charged on interest loans from the fund, and only the amount actually loaned from the fund shall be required to be repaid.

Repayment of interest loans from the fund shall be made to the lender, which shall remit the amounts collected to the department for deposit into the fund. However, if the repayment period for an interest loan exceeds the time for repayment of the principal loan amount to the lender, when the final principal payment is made to the lender all subsequent interest loan payments shall be made by the farmer, directly to the department to be deposited into the fund.

The lender shall notify the department, as soon as possible, of any change in the principal loan status, release of collateral or any other matter that may adversely affect the security of the state’s loan.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1987, ch. 482, § 9; Laws, 1988, ch. 356, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved April 15, 1988).